Oklahoma, session 2025, SB584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-112 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Consumer” shall have the same meaning as the term is


defined in 15 U.S.C., Section 1681a(c);


2. “Consumer report” shall have the same meaning as the term is


defined in 15 U.S.C., Section 1681a(d)(1), except that the term


shall not include a consumer report requested by an employer for


employment purposes; and



Req. No. 435 Page 1


3. “Consumer reporting agency” shall have the same meaning as


the term is defined in 15 U.S.C., Section 1681a(f).


B. On and after January 1, 2026, no person or entity shall


request a consumer report from a consumer reporting agency for the


purposes of facilitating a credit or insurance transaction, without


obtaining signed consent on a form provided in subsection C of this


section, if the request will affect the credit score or the credit


report of the consumer.


C. Before January 1, 2026, the Department of Consumer Credit


shall make available online a form, as prescribed by the Commission


on Consumer Credit, for consumer disclosure and the consent of the


consumer authorizing the request to obtain a consumer report. The


form shall contain:


1. A section requiring the identifying information of the


person or entity requesting the consumer report of the consumer and


the reason for obtaining the consumer report;


2. A section in which the consumer provides his or her name and


signature consenting to the furnishing of the consumer report; and


3. A statement of disclosure describing what the consumer


report entails and the effect it will have on the credit score and


the consumer report of the consumer.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-435 QD 1/19/2025 5:39:14 AM

Req. No. 435 Page 2